Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Witnesses Generally

Cross references. —

As to witnesses in bribery cases, see art. 3, § 44, Wyo. Const.

For authority of district court commissioner to issue and enforce process for attendance of witnesses, see §

5-3-307

.

As to summoning and enforcing attendance of witnesses in trials before police justices in cities of the first class, see §

5-6-206

.

As to validity and summons of verbal notice to witnesses with reference to date of trial upon continuance, see §

5-6-209

.

As to issuance of subpoenas and compelling attendance of witnesses at coroners' inquest, see §

7-4-203

.

As to applicability of civil procedure provisions to criminal cases, see §

7-11-403

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81 Am. Jur. 2d Witnesses § 1 et seq.

“Uniform Act to Secure Attendance of Witnesses from Without State in Criminal Cases” generally, 44 ALR2d 732.

Right to cross-examine witness as to his place of residence, 85 ALR3d 541.

Court's witnesses (other than expert) in state criminal prosecution, 16 ALR4th 352.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecution's calling as witness, to extract claim of self-incrimination privilege, one involved in offense charged against accused, 19 ALR4th 368.

Right to impeach witness in criminal case by inquiry or evidence as to witness' criminal activity for which witness was arrested or charged, but not convicted — modern state cases, 28 ALR4th 505.

Permissibility of impeaching credibility of witness by showing verdict of guilty without judgment of sentence thereon, 28 ALR4th 647.

Fact that witness undergoes hypnotic examination as affecting admissibility of testimony in civil case, 31 ALR4th 1239.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of comments by counsel vouching for credibility of witness — state cases, 45 ALR4th 602.

Closed-circuit television witness examination, 61 ALR4th 1155.

Compelling testimony of opponent's expert in state court, 66 ALR4th 213.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or question examining doctor—modern cases, 77 ALR4th 463.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine that party's attorney—modern cases, 78 ALR4th 571.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine witness who was occupant of vehicle involved in accident—modern cases, 78 ALR4th 616.

Adverse presumption or inference based on state's failure to produce or examine law enforcement personnel — modern cases, 81 ALR4th 872.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine transferor, transferee, broker or other person allegedly involved in transaction at issue — modern cases, 81 ALR4th 939.

Propriety of using prior conviction for drug dealing to impeach witness in criminal trial, 37 ALR5th 319.

Right of immune jury witness to obtain access to government affidavits and other supporting materials in order to challenge legality of court-ordered wiretap or electronic surveillance which provided basis for questions asked in grand jury proceedings, 60 ALR Fed 706.

98 C.J.S. Witnesses §§ 87, 90 to 92, 122 to 131, 144 to 146, 161, 165 to 175, 191 to 200, 202, 204 to 248.

§ 1-12-101.
Privileged communications and acts.

The following persons shall not testify in certain respects:

An attorney or a physician concerning a communication made to him by his client or patient in that relation, or his advice to his client or patient. The attorney or physician may testify by express consent of the client or patient, and if the client or patient voluntarily testifies the attorney or physician may be compelled to testify on the same subject;

A clergyman or priest concerning a confession made to him in his professional character if enjoined by the church to which he belongs;

Husband or wife, except as provided in W.S.

1-12-104

;

A person who assigns his claim or interest concerning any matter in respect to which he would not be permitted to testify if a party;

A person who, if a party, would be restricted in his evidence under W.S.

1-12-102

shall, where the property is sold or transferred by an executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, heir, devisee or legatee, be restricted in the same manner in any action or proceeding concerning the property;

A confidential intermediary, as defined in W.S. 1-22-201(a)(viii), concerning communications made to him or information obtained by him during the course of an investigation pursuant to W.S.

1-22-203

, when the public interests, in the judgment of the court, would suffer by the disclosure.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 249; R.S. 1887, § 2589; R.S. 1899, § 3682; Laws 1909, ch. 145, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4537; C.S. 1920, § 5806; R.S. 1931, § 89-1703; C.S. 1945, § 3-2602; W.S. 1957, § 1-139; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-102

; Laws 1991, ch. 125, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to health-care-provider privilege not applying in worker's compensation cases, see §

27-14-610

.

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Privilege waived if not claimed. —

The rule is well established that the physician-patient privilege must be claimed and the evidence objected to or the privilege is waived. Frias v. State, 722 P.2d 135,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1986).

There is no physician-patient privilege at common law.

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Physician cannot testify to communication made to him by his patient

even though the patient is not a party to the action in which a disclosure is sought and is not present to object. Peters v. Campbell, 80 Wyo. 492, 345 P.2d 234,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1959).

Confidentiality waiver of patient contested issues. —

This section does not prohibit a treating physician from expressing his expert opinion regarding issues placed into contest by his patient, their confidentiality privilege having been implicitly waived. Wardell v. McMillan, 844 P.2d 1052,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1992).

Physician-patient and psychologist-client privileges limited
by §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

. —

The privileges created between physician-patient and psychologist-client by this section and §

33-27-123

are limited by the subsequent enactment of §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

, which set forth a procedure for ascertaining and correcting child abuse and neglect. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Attorney-client privilege in federal court. —

Rule 501 of the Federal Rules of Evidence provides that state law supplies the rule of decision on privilege in diversity cases. Frontier Ref. v. Gorman-Rupp Co., 136 F.3d 695, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 2032 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

Attorney's advice to opposing party. —

In an action praying for a judgment declaring that a subdivision's restrictive covenant prohibited the on-site use of a trailer for habitation during construction, allowing a partner in the law firm which was representing the plaintiffs in another case involving the subdivision's covenants to testify did not violate subsection (a)(i), as the attorney did not testify about communications from the plaintiffs to his firm or advice from his firm to the plaintiffs. Instead, he testified about his advice to the defendant concerning the covenant's meaning. Samuel v. Zwerin, 868 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1994).

Testimony of attorney improperly excluded. —

In an action to set aside deeds executed by plaintiff to the defendant where the plaintiff testified that she did not voluntarily execute the deeds and that she did not understand the effect of the deeds, the trial court committed error in excluding the testimony of plaintiff's attorney who offered to testify for defendant, but such error was not reversible error where the excluded testimony was cumulative. Bergren v. Berggren, 77 Wyo. 438, 317 P.2d 1101,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1957).

Privilege does not apply when spouse charges crime against
the other. —

Defendant's wife, who was an alleged victim spouse, could be compelled by the state to testify against defendant because the marital privilege did not apply when one spouse was charged with a crime against the other.
Rogers v. State, 2008 WY 90, 189 P.3d 265,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2008).

Harmless error.—

Even assuming that a physician’s testimony and a medical record were protected by the physician-patient privilege and that a district court erred in admitting the evidence in a termination of parental rights trial, the error was harmless because there was no reasonable probability that the verdict would have been more favorable to the parent in the absence of the evidence. The jury’s conclusion was unassailable as the additional evidence at trial was more than ample to show that the parent was unfit to have custody and control of the child. In re L-MHB, 2020 WY 1, 454 P.3d 935,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2020).

Privilege waived. —

When it is remembered that the prohibition against testimony respecting confidential communications is generally more strictly guarded than most other privileges, it is safe to conclude that when a defendant, entitled to the privilege of having his wife's testimony against him excluded, makes charges against his wife, testifies she accused him of having carnal knowledge of their daughter, then told him she had made a mistake, and denies the evidence given by his daughter which involved his wife, his privilege not to have her testify against him is waived, at least insofar as to the matters about which he has given testimony. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

Attorney billing statements may be privileged. —

There is no
blanket rule permitting a party to refuse to produce all of its detailed
billing statements. In some instances, however, a billing statement
may contain communications between the client and the attorney or
legal advice given, bringing it under the definition of privilege
in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-12-101

(2015). Dishman v. First Interstate Bank, 2015 WY 154, 362 P.3d 360,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Freudenthal v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 2010 WY 80, 233 P.3d 933,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(June 22, 2010).

Stated

in

Burk v. Burzynski, 672 P.2d 419,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Pinther v. Pinther, 888 P.2d 1250,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1995); Ortega v. State, 966 P.2d 961,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1998); Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. of Sheridan Cnty. Sch. Dist. #2, 2015 WY 70,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(May 14, 2015).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Spouse's Testimony in Criminal Cases,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 35 (1964).

See note, “Are the Records of Mental Hospitals Privileged in Mental Incompetency Adjudications?,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 59 (1964).

For discussion of privileges and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For case note, “Wyoming's New Missing Witness Rule, Seyle v. State, 584 P.2d 1081,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 569 (1979).

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming's Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For case note, “Evidence — Recognition of a Federal Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege. Jaffee v. Redmond, 518 U.S. 1, 116 S. Ct. 1923, 135 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 3879 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 873 (1997).

For comment, “Protecting Our Children in Custody Cases: The Wyoming Legislature Should Create an Attorney/Guardian Ad Litem Who Represents the Best Interests of the Child and Can Give the Child the Benefit of Limited Confidentiality,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 427 (1999).

For article, “Ethical Considerations When Representing Organizations,” see 3 Wyo. L. Rev. 581 (2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of one against whom testimony is offered to invoke privilege of communications between others, 2 ALR2d 645.

Conversation between husband and wife relating to property or business as within rule excluding private communications between them, 4 ALR2d 835.

“Communications” within testimonial privilege of confidential communications between husband and wife as including knowledge derived from observation by 1 spouse of acts of other spouse, 10 ALR2d 1389.

Discovery, in medical malpractice action, of names and medical records of other patients to whom defendant has given treatment similar to that allegedly injuring plaintiff, 66 ALR5th 591.

Construction and effect of statutory provision as to relaxation, in event of action for personal injuries, of rule in respect of communications between physician and patient, 25 ALR2d 1429.

Admissibility of testimony by an attorney as to unperformed compromise agreement, 26 ALR2d 858.

Admissibility, on issue of child's legitimacy or parentage, of confidential communication between husband and wife, 31 ALR2d 989.

Privilege against disclosure of matters arising out of transactions or relationship between accountant and client or attorney acting as accountant, 38 ALR2d 670.

Privileged nature of hospital record relating to intoxication or sobriety of patient, 38 ALR2d 778, 9 ALR Fed 457.

Proof of due execution of lost will as affected by privilege attaching to attorney-client communications, 41 ALR2d 393.

Privilege of communications by or to nurse or attendant, 47 ALR2d 742.

Party's waiver of privilege as to communications with counsel by taking stand and testifying, 51 ALR2d 521.

Admissibility of sound recordings in evidence as affected by privileged nature of communications, 58 ALR2d 1024, 57 ALR3d 746, 58 ALR3d 598.

Right of physician, notwithstanding physician-patient privilege, to give expert testimony based on hypothetical question, 64 ALR2d 1056.

Privilege as to communications to attorney in connection with drawing of will, 66 ALR2d 1302.

Waiver of attorney-client privilege by personal representative or heir of deceased client or by guardian of incompetent, 67 ALR2d 1268.

Person other than client or attorney affected by or included within privilege attaching to communication between client and attorney, 96 ALR2d 125.

Who may waive privilege of confidential communications to physician by persons since deceased, 97 ALR2d 393.

Corporation's right to assert attorney-client privilege, 98 ALR2d 241.

Testimony as to communications or observations as to mental condition of patient treated for other condition, 100 ALR2d 648.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to communications with respect to contemplated tortious acts, 2 ALR3d 861.

Waiver of privilege as regards 1 physician as a waiver as to other physicians, 5 ALR3d 1244.

Attorney-client privilege as affected by communications between several attorneys, 9 ALR3d 1420.

Disclosure of name, identity, address, occupation or business of client as violation of attorney-client privilege, 16 ALR3d 1047.

Admissibility of physician's testimony as to patient's statements or declarations, other than res gestae, during medical examination, 37 ALR3d 778.

Privilege arising from relationship between psychiatrist or psychologist and patient, 44 ALR3d 24.

Who is “clergyman” or the like entitled to assert privilege attaching to communications to clergymen or spiritual advisers, 49 ALR3d 1205.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to communications relating to drafting of nontestamentary documents, 55 ALR3d 1322.

Matters to which the privilege covering communications to clergyman or spiritual advisor extend, 71 ALR3d 794.

Physician-patient privilege as applied to physician's testimony concerning wound required to be reported to public authority, 85 ALR3d 1196.

Effect, on competency to testify against spouse or on marital communication privilege, of separation or other marital instability short of absolute divorce, 98 ALR3d 1285.

Spouse's betrayal or connivance as extending marital communications privilege to testimony of third person, 3 ALR4th 1104.

Communication between unmarried couple living together as privileged, 4 ALR4th 422.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to evidence or testimony in subsequent action between parties originally represented contemporaneously by same attorney, with reference to communication to or from one party, 4 ALR4th 765.

Testimony before or communications to private professional society's judicial commission, ethics committee, or the like, as privileged, 9 ALR4th 807.

Existence of spousal privilege where marriage was entered into for purpose of barring testimony, 13 ALR4th 1305.

Applicability of attorney-client privilege to communications made in presence of or solely to or by third person, 14 ALR4th 594.

Attorney-client privilege as extending to communications relating to contemplated civil fraud, 31 ALR4th 458.

Privilege as to communications between lay representative in judicial or administrative proceedings and client, 31 ALR4th 1226.

Privileged communications between accountant and client, 33 ALR4th 539.

Presence of child at communication between husband and wife as destroying confidentiality of otherwise privileged communication between them, 39 ALR4th 480.

Assignability of claim for legal malpractice, 40 ALR4th 684.

Validity, construction and application of statute limiting physician-patient privilege in judicial proceedings relating to child abuse or neglect, 44 ALR4th 649.

Propriety of governmental eavesdropping on communications between accused and his attorney, 44 ALR4th 841.

Physician's tort liability for unauthorized disclosure of confidential information about patient, 48 ALR4th 668.

Discovery: right to ex parte interview with injured party's treating physician, 50 ALR4th 714.

Insured-insurer communications as privileged, 55 ALR4th 336.

Communications between spouses as to joint participation in crime as within privilege of interspousal communications, 62 ALR4th 1134.

Attorney-client privilege: who is “representative of the client” within state statute or rule privileging communications between an attorney and the representative of the client, 66 ALR4th 1227.

Invasion of privacy by a clergyman, church or religious group, 67 ALR4th 1086.

Crimes against spouse within exception permitting testimony by one spouse against other in criminal prosecution—modern state cases, 74 ALR4th 223.

Competency of one spouse to testify against other in prosecution for offense against third party as affected by fact that offense against spouse was involved in same transaction, 74 ALR4th 277.

Involuntary disclosure or surrender of will prior to testator's death, 75 ALR4th 1144.

Determination of whether a communication is from a corporate client for purposes of the attorney-client privilege—modern cases, 26 ALR5th 628.

What corporate communications are entitled to attorney-client privilege—modern cases, 27 ALR5th 76.

What persons or entities may assert or waive corporation's attorney-client privilege — modern cases, 28 ALR5th 1.

Waiver of evidentiary privilege by inadvertent disclosure — state law, 51 ALR5th 603.

Testimonial privilege for confidential communications between relatives other than husband and wife — state cases, 62 ALR5th 629.

What constitutes “confidential source” within Freedom of Information
Act exemption permitting nondisclosure of identity of confidential
source and, in specified instances, of confidential information furnished
only by confidential source (5 USC § 522(b)(7)(D)),
59 ALR Fed 550.

Psychotherapist-patient privilege under federal common law, 72 ALR Fed 395.

Immunity's sufficiency to meet federal grand jury witness' claim of privilege against adverse spousal testimony, 82 ALR Fed 600.

Attorney's disclosure, in federal proceedings, of identity of client as violating attorney-client privilege, 84 ALR Fed 852.

Academic peer review privilege in federal court, 85 ALR Fed 691.

Communications to clergyman as privileged in federal proceedings, 118 ALR Fed 449.

What are matters “related solely to the internal personnel rules and practices of an agency” exempted from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act (5 USCS § 552(b)(2)), 141 ALR Fed 531.

Determination and application of correct legal standard in weighing medical opinion of treating source in Social Security disability cases, 149 ALR Fed 1.

Waiver of evidentiary privilege by inadvertent disclosure-federal law, 159 ALR Fed 153.

Views of United States Supreme Court as to attorney-client privilege, 159 ALR Fed 243.

“Communications” within testimonial privilege of confidential communications between husband and wife as including knowledge derived from observation by one spouse of acts of other spouse. 23 A.L.R.6th 1.

Application of attorney-client privilege to electronic documents. 26 A.L.R.6th 287.

§ 1-12-102.
When party incapable of testifying.

In an action or suit
by or against a person who from any cause is incapable of testifying,
or by or against a trustee, executor, administrator, heir or other
representative of the person incapable of testifying, no judgment
or decree founded on uncorroborated testimony shall be rendered in
favor of a party whose interests are adverse to the person incapable
of testifying or his trustee, executor, administrator, heir or other
representative. In any such action or suit, if the adverse party testifies,
all entries, memorandum and declarations by the party incapable of
testifying made while he was capable, relevant to the matter in issue,
may be received in evidence.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-103

.

This section embodies “dead man's statute.”

Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Rule 601, W.R.E., does not supersede effect of this section.

Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Summary judgment. —

The requirement of corroboration of evidence against a party incapable of testifying under the statute should not come into play at the summary judgment stage; it is the movant's obligation to show that no genuine issue of material fact exists, not to rely on the evidence or lack of evidence of the nonmovant. Drake v. Winkler, 838 P.2d 1177,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1992).

Test in this section is one of corroboration

rather than one of competency. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

To be corroborative,

as required under this section, the evidence offered must be such that it would support or tend to support, in some degree at least, some of the material issues of the claim which are testified to by the witness whose evidence is sought to be corroborated. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Sources of compliance with corroboration requirement. —

Compliance with the corroboration requirement of this section can occur from any competent witness or any other legal sources such as deeds, records or reports. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Testimony of adverse claimant alone is not sufficient to satisfy corroboration requirement

of this section. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

But introduction of profit sheets and testimony of record compilers
held corroborative. —

The plaintiff's introduction of profit sheets and testimony of persons in charge of compiling company records is enough, under the requirement of this section, to corroborate plaintiff's claim on an oral agreement made with the deceased. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Burden of corroboration is on adverse party who is testifying

and not on the deceased's representatives. Consolidated Constr. v. Smith, 634 P.2d 902,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1981).

Proof of oral contract to make will. —

A party who asserted the existence of an oral contract between two other persons to make a will, and who claimed to be a beneficiary thereunder, had the burden of proving it and, although his testimony may have been admissible under this section, it could not support a judgment without corroboration. Sievers v. Barton, 775 P.2d 489,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1989).

Erroneous exclusion of testimony. —

The district court's erroneous conclusion that a personal representative's uncorroborated testimony should be disregarded did not require reversal absent any showing that the court's interpretation of this section prejudiced the personal representative's substantial rights. Estate of Short, 785 P.2d 1167,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1990).

Inherent unfairness. —

It would simply be unfair to permit the use of statements made by the principal shareholder and operating officer of the corporation to be used against the entity and then invoke the dead man's statute to prohibit any contrary statements that were made by that corporate officer. Metz Bev. Co. v. Wyo. Bevs. Inc., 2002 WY 21, 39 P.3d 1051,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2002).

Applied

in

McClellan v. Britain, 826 P.2d 245,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Adkins v. Lawson, 892 P.2d 128,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Moncrief v. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co., 880 F. Supp. 1495, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3381 (D. Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Article VI of the Wyoming Rules of Evidence: Witnesses,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 909 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of dead man's statute in proceeding involving account of personal representative, 2 ALR2d 349.

Applicability of dead man's statute to testimony denying transaction or communication between witness and person since deceased, 8 ALR2d 1094.

Statute excluding testimony of person because of death of another as applicable where deceased was coparty with person or persons still living in contract or transaction to which testimony relates, 22 ALR2d 1068.

Introduction of decedent's books of account by his personal representative as rendering the adverse party or interested person a competent witness, 26 ALR2d 1009.

Dead man's statute as applicable to spouse of party disqualified from testifying, 27 ALR2d 538.

Examination and the like of witness incompetent under dead man's statute as waiver of incompetency of other witnesses, 33 ALR2d 1440.

Proof of due execution of lost will by testimony of persons who will benefit from establishment, 41 ALR2d 393.

Propriety of compelling witness to testify, in pretrial proceeding, as to matters which would be prohibited in trial testimony by dead man's statute, 42 ALR2d 578.

What constitutes claim or demand against estate within statute disqualifying witness, 54 ALR2d 1103.

Applicability of dead man's statute to proceedings to determine liability for succession, estate or inheritance tax, 66 ALR2d 714.

Competency of witness in wrongful death action as affected by dead man's statute, 77 ALR2d 676.

Testimony to facts of automobile accident as testimony to a “transaction” or “communication” with a deceased person within dead man's statute, 80 ALR2d 1296.

Competency of interested witness to testify as to handwriting or signature of decedent, 13 ALR3d 404.

Statute excluding testimony of person because of death of another as applied to testimony in respect of lost or destroyed instrument, 18 ALR3d 606.

Taking depositions or serving interrogatories in civil case as waiver of incompetency of witness, 23 ALR3d 389.

Personal representative's loss of rights under dead man's statute by prior institution of discovery proceedings, 35 ALR3d 955.

Applicability to attorneys of statute excluding testimony of party to action or transaction because of death of another, 67 ALR3d 924.

Use of evidence excludible under dead man's statute to defeat or support summary judgment, 67 ALR3d 970.

Dead man's statutes as affected by Rule 601 of the Uniform Rules of Evidence and similar state rules, 50 ALR4th 1238.

§ 1-12-103.
Compelling testimony of adverse parties in civil and criminal actions.

A party may compel the
adverse party to testify orally or by deposition as any other witness,
and no person is disqualified as a witness in any action, civil or
criminal, because of his interest in the same as a party or otherwise.
Every person is a competent witness except as otherwise provided by
law, but his interest in the action may be shown to affect the credibility
of the witness. Any party of record in a civil action, or any person
for whose immediate benefit the action is prosecuted or defended,
or his assignor, officer, agent or employee or if a county or city
is a party any officer of the county or city, may be examined upon
the trial of any action as if under cross-examination at the instance
of the adverse party and may be compelled to testify subject to the
same rules for examination as any other witness. The party calling
for the examination is not concluded thereby and may rebut the evidence
given by counter or impeaching testimony.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 251; R.S. 1887, § 2591; R.S. 1899, § 3684; C.S. 1910, § 4539; C.S. 1920, § 5808; Laws 1921, ch. 116, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-1705; C.S. 1945, § 3-2604; Laws 1955, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-141; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-104

.

Cross references. —

As to self-incrimination, see art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const.

True test of right to cross-examine

under this section is whether the party called is in fact adverse to the one calling him as a witness. Husted v. French Creek Ranch, 79 Wyo. 307, 333 P.2d 948,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1959).

The test under the provisions of this section as to whether an adverse party may be called for cross-examination is whether the party is actually an adverse party. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

The test of the right to call for cross-examination under this section is whether the person so called is adverse in material and relevant sense to the party calling him. Huber v. Thomas, 45 Wyo. 440, 19 P.2d 1042,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1933).

Whether party so called is friendly is question for discretion of trial judge.

Huber v. Thomas, 45 Wyo. 440, 19 P.2d 1042,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1933).

Necessarily in the administration of the law the trial judge will guide the matter in the exercise of a sound discretion. Husted v. French Creek Ranch, 79 Wyo. 307, 333 P.2d 948,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1959).

Spencer was a codefendant with appellant and the testimony he gave, if at all damaging, was as hurtful to him as it was to the appellant, and it will not be assumed he was unfriendly to himself. Furthermore, the admitted matter pleaded was also testified to by other witnesses and the same is true of all, or practically all, of Spencer's testimony. Even if there remained any doubt about this, the appellant seems to have lost its right to now complain because appellant failed to follow up its objection on that score. Appellant elected to call Spencer on its own account for similar cross-examination, and so had ample opportunity to impeach or discredit him had that been possible. Spencer also testified on direct examination in his own behalf, thus giving appellant further opportunity to subject him to additional searching cross-inquiry. The brief cross-examination attempted by appellant, however, failed to alter Spencer's testimony. The supreme court was not disposed to say in this instance that the trial court's discretion was abused. Husted v. French Creek Ranch, 79 Wyo. 307, 333 P.2d 948,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1959).

When it appears that a party called for cross-examination is friendly

in fact to the party calling him the cross-examination should not be permitted. Huber v. Thomas, 45 Wyo. 440, 19 P.2d 1042,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1933).

Surviving codefendant. —

A codefendant who admits all the claims of the plaintiff in an action to foreclose a mortgage on deceased partner's homestead, held not an adverse party which the plaintiff might call under this section. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Adverse and surviving party,

when compelled to testify by an executor or administrator, cannot reasonably complain, for, although a party, he can then be examined fully in his own behalf on the subject of his examination in chief. Hay v. Peterson, 6 Wyo. 419, 45 P. 1073,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1896).

Section permits impeachment

as to character of only such witnesses as are hostile in fact. Huber v. Thomas, 45 Wyo. 440, 19 P.2d 1042,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1933).

Where defendants were not allowed to call a witness for cross-examination under this section and were limited in cross-examining him when called by plaintiff to clarify his testimony, and they thereafter called him as their own witness, they were not allowed to impeach his testimony. Huber v. Thomas, 45 Wyo. 440, 19 P.2d 1042,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1933).

Applied

in

Hawkey v. Williams, 72 Wyo. 20, 261 P.2d 48,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1953); Hawkey v. Williams, 73 Wyo. 463, 281 P.2d 447,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1955).

Quoted

in

Johnston v. Vukelic, 67 Wyo. 1, 213 P.2d 925,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1950).

Cited

in

Megown v. Fuller, 38 Wyo. 211, 266 P. 124,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1928); Puterman v. Puterman, 66 Wyo. 89, 205 P.2d 815,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1949); Rogers v. State, 2008 WY 90, 189 P.3d 265,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(July 31, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Article VI of the Wyoming Rules of Evidence: Witnesses,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 909 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney as witness for client in civil proceedings — modern state cases, 35 ALR4th 810.